Utah statutes.
7-3-31.   Oath of bank directors.

When a person is appointed or elected to be a director of a bank, that person shall take an oath promising to diligently carry out the duties required of a director, to honestly administer the affairs of the bank, and not to knowingly violate or wilfully permit the violation of any of the provisions of law applicable to the bank. The oath shall be subscribed by the director and shall be immediately filed in the office of the commissioner.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

